Washington statutes.
RCW 39.116.020

Data submission for covered products—Requirements—Selected firms—Suppliers—Department may provide financial assistance.

(1)(a) Beginning July 1, 2025, an awarding authority must require in all newly executed construction contracts that the selected firm for a construction contract for a covered project larger than 100,000 gross square feet submit the following data for each covered product used before substantial completion, including at a minimum:

(i) Product quantity;

(ii) A current environmental product declaration;

(iii) Health product declaration, if any, completed for the product;

(iv) Manufacturer name and location, including state or province and country;

(v) Supplier code of conduct, if any; and

(vi) Office of minority and women-owned business enterprises certification, if any.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2027, an awarding authority must require in all newly executed construction contracts that the selected firm for a construction contract for a covered project submit the data required by (a) of this subsection for each covered product used before substantial completion.

(c) The selected firm for a contract for a covered project shall provide the data required by this subsection for at least 90 percent of the cost of each of the covered products used in the project.

(2) The selected firm for a contract for a covered project is required to collect and submit from product suppliers the information required in subsection (1)(a)(ii) through (vi) of this section. The selected firm is not required to verify the information received from product suppliers.

(3)(a) Beginning July 1, 2025, an awarding authority must require in all newly executed construction contracts that the selected firm for a construction contract for a covered project larger than 100,000 gross square feet to ask their suppliers to report for each covered product used before substantial completion, including at a minimum:

(i) Names and locations, including state or province and country, of the actual production facilities; and

(ii) Working conditions at the actual production facilities for all employees, full-time employees, part-time employees, and temporary employees. In cases in which the supplier does not have this information, the selected firm for a contract for a covered project must ask suppliers to provide a report on steps taken to reasonably obtain the data and provide suppliers' self-reports to the awarding authority.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2027, an awarding authority must require in all newly executed construction contracts that the successful bidder for a construction contract for a covered project to meet the requirements of (a) of this subsection for each covered product used before substantial completion.

(c) The selected firm is not required to verify the information reported by product suppliers pursuant to this subsection.

(d) The selected firm for a contract for a covered project shall meet the requirement in (a) of this subsection for at least 90 percent of the cost of each of the covered products used in the project.

(4) If a supply chain specific environmental product declaration is not available, a product and facility specific report may be submitted.

(5) This section does not apply to a covered product for a particular covered project if the awarding authority determines, upon written justification provided to the department, that the requirements in this section would cause a significant delay in completion, significant increase in overall project cost, or result in only one product supplier being able to provide the covered product.

(6) An awarding authority must include the information and reporting requirements in this section in a specification for bids for a covered project.

(7) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the department may provide financial assistance to small businesses, as defined in RCW 19.85.020, to help offset the costs to the small business of producing an environmental product declaration required under this section. Such financial assistance supports the production of environmental product declarations and achievement of reductions of embodied carbon in the built environment while ensuring that small manufacturers are not put at a competitive disadvantage in state contracting as a result of the requirements of this chapter.

(8) Compliance with the requirements in this section may not be used as a basis for a waiver from apprenticeship utilization requirements in any other statute, rule, regulation, or law.

[ 2024 c 344 s 3.]